New Jersey, session 221, S434.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. A student who successfully completes a course at a county fire academy shall be eligible to receive credit toward meeting high school graduation requirements for health, safety, and physical education in accordance with N.J.A.C.6A:8-5.1, provided that the student: (1) is between the ages of 16 and 18 years old; (2) completes an examination, as applicable, to become a junior firefighter, or an equivalent position; and (3) commits to volunteer at the fire department that serves the municipality in which the student resides for a period of two years. b. Nothing in this act shall be construed as fulfilling the requirement to become a member of the Junior Firefighters Auxiliary established pursuant to N.J.S.40A:14-96. 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.